Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF3684.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2025 Supplement, section 134.45, subdivision 4, is amended to read: Subd. 4. Match. A public library jurisdiction applying for a grant under this section must match the grant with deleted text begin localdeleted text end new text begin nonstatenew text end funds. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective for grants awarded after June 30, 2026. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2025 Supplement, section 134.45, subdivision 5b, is amended to read: Subd. 5b. Qualification; improvement grants. A public library jurisdiction may apply for a grant in an amount up to deleted text begin $1,000,000deleted text end new text begin $2,000,000new text end or 50 percent, whichever is less, of the approved costs of renovating or expanding an existing library building, or to construct a new library building. Renovation may include remediation of conditions hazardous to health or safety. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective for grants awarded after June 30, 2026. new text end